District of Columbia statutes.
4-1301.08

Photographs and radiological examination.

As part of the investigation required by this part, any person responsible for the investigation may take, or have taken, photographs of each area of possible trauma on the child or photographs of the conditions surrounding the suspected abuse or neglect of the child, and if medically indicated, have radiological examinations, including full skeletal x-rays, performed on the child.

History

Sept. 23, 1977, D.C. Law 2-22, title I, § 108, 24 DCR 3341
Oct. 19, 2002, D.C. Law 14-206, § 2(d), 49 DCR 7815
Apr. 12, 2005, D.C. Law 15-341,§ 2(d), 52 DCR 2315

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 6-2106.
1973 Ed., § 6-2106.

Effect of Amendments

D.C. Law 14-206 substituted “substantiated report” for “supported report”.
D.C. Law 15-341 rewrote the section which had read as follows: “If there is a substantiated report, any person responsible for the investigation under § 4-1301.06 may take, or have taken, color photographs of each area of trauma visible on the child or photographs of the conditions surrounding the neglect of the child and, if medically indicated, have radiological examinations performed on the child.”

Temporary Amendment of Section

For temporary (225 day) amendment of section, see § 3(b) of Improved Child Abuse Investigations Technical Temporary Amendment Act of 2002 (D.C. Law 14-240, March 25, 2003, law notification 50 DCR 2753).

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90 day) delay of the applicability of provisions changing the manner in which the Child and Family Services Agency will process reports of child abuse and neglect, see § 3 of Improved Child Abuse Investigations Technical Emergency Amendment Act of 2002 (D.C. Act 14-494, October 23, 2002, 49 DCR 9781).
For temporary (90 day) delay of the applicability of provisions changing the manner in which the Child and Family Services Agency will process reports of child abuse and neglect, see § 3 of Improved Child Abuse Investigations Technical Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2002 (D.C. Act 14-603, January 7, 2003, 50 DCR 687).

Editor's Notes

Application of Law 14-206: Section 16(b) of D.C. Law 14-310 provided that section 2(a)(2), (4), (5), (6), and (7), (b), (c), (d), (e), (h), (i), (j), (k), and (l) of D.C. Law 14-206 shall apply as of October 1, 2003.